Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 3 Priority

11-9-317.
Interests that take priority over or take free of security interest or agricultural lien.

Conflicting security interests and rights of lien creditors.A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:

A person entitled to priority under Code Section 11-9-322; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a person that becomes a lien creditor before the earlier of the time:

The security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or

A financing statement covering the collateral is filed.

Buyers that receive delivery.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Lessees that receive delivery.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Licensees and buyers of certain collateral.A licensee of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a certificated security takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

Purchase money security interest.Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 11-9-320 and 11-9-321, if a person files a financing statement with respect to a purchase money security interest before or within 20 days after the debtor receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time the security interest attaches and the time of filing.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-317, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 481, § 2-28/HB 451; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 6/SB 185.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 27, 2010, inserted “tangible” near the middle of subsection (b); and inserted “electronic documents,” in the middle of subsection (d). See the Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “certificated security” for “security certificate” in subsection (b); and substituted “collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments, or a” for “accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, general intangibles, or investment property other than a” in subsection (d).

11-9-318.
No interest retained in right to payment that is sold; rights and title of seller of account or chattel paper with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Seller retains no interest.A debtor that has sold an account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or promissory note does not retain a legal or equitable interest in the collateral sold.

Deemed rights of debtor if buyer’s security interest unperfected.For purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of an account or chattel paper from, a debtor that has sold an account or chattel paper, while the buyer’s security interest is unperfected, the debtor is deemed to have rights and title to the account or chattel paper identical to those the debtor sold.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-318, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-319.
Rights and title of consignee with respect to creditors and purchasers.

Consignee has consignor’s rights.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, for purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of goods from, a consignee, while the goods are in the possession of the consignee, the consignee is deemed to have rights and title to the goods identical to those the consignor had or had power to transfer.

Applicability of other law.For purposes of determining the rights of a creditor of a consignee, law other than this article determines the rights and title of a consignee while goods are in the consignee’s possession if, under this part, a perfected security interest held by the consignor would have priority over the rights of the creditor.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-319, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-320.
Buyer of goods.

Buyer in ordinary course of business.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a buyer in ordinary course of business, other than a person buying farm products from a person engaged in farming operations, takes free of a security interest created by the buyer’s seller, even if the security interest is perfected and the buyer knows of its existence.

Buyer of consumer goods.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, a buyer of goods from a person who used or bought the goods for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes takes free of a security interest, even if perfected, if the buyer buys:

Without knowledge of the security interest;

For value;

Primarily for the buyer’s personal, family, or household purposes; and

Before the filing of a financing statement covering the goods.

Effectiveness of filing for subsection (b) of this Code section.To the extent that it affects the priority of a security interest over a buyer of goods under subsection (b) of this Code section, the period of effectiveness of a filing made in the jurisdiction in which the seller is located is governed by subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 11-9-316.

Buyer in ordinary course of business at wellhead or minehead.A buyer in ordinary course of business buying oil, gas, or other minerals at the wellhead or minehead or after extraction takes free of an interest arising out of an encumbrance.

Possessory security interest not affected.Subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section do not affect a security interest in goods in the possession of the secured party under Code Section 11-9-313.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-320, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-321.
Licensee of general intangible and lessee of goods in ordinary course of business.

“Licensee in ordinary course of business.” As used in this Code section, the term “licensee in ordinary course of business” means a person that becomes a licensee of a general intangible in good faith, without knowledge that the license violates the rights of another person in the general intangible, and in the ordinary course from a person in the business of licensing general intangibles of that kind. A person becomes a licensee in the ordinary course if the license to the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the licensor is engaged or with the licensor’s own usual or customary practices.

Rights of licensee in ordinary course of business.A licensee in ordinary course of business takes its rights under a nonexclusive license free of a security interest in the general intangible created by the licensor, even if the security interest is perfected and the licensee knows of its existence.

Rights of lessee in ordinary course of business.A lessee in ordinary course of business takes its leasehold interest free of a security interest in the goods created by the lessor, even if the security interest is perfected and the lessee knows of its existence.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-321, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-322.
Priorities among conflicting security interests in and agricultural liens on same collateral.

General priority rules.Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, priority among conflicting security interests and agricultural liens in the same collateral is determined according to the following rules:

Conflicting perfected security interests and agricultural liens rank according to priority in time of filing or perfection. Priority dates from the earlier of the time a filing covering the collateral is first made or the security interest or agricultural lien is first perfected, if there is no period thereafter when there is neither filing nor perfection;

A perfected security interest or agricultural lien has priority over a conflicting unperfected security interest or agricultural lien; and

The first security interest or agricultural lien to attach or become effective has priority if conflicting security interests and agricultural liens are unperfected.

Time of perfection: proceeds and supporting obligations.For the purposes paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section:

The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in proceeds; and

The time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in collateral supported by a supporting obligation is also the time of filing or perfection as to a security interest in the supporting obligation.

Special priority rules: proceeds and supporting obligations.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, a security interest in collateral which qualifies for priority over a conflicting security interest under Code Section 11-9-327, 11-9-328, 11-9-329, 11-9-330, or 11-9-331 also has priority over a conflicting security interest in:

Any supporting obligation for the collateral; and

Proceeds of the collateral if:

The security interest in proceeds is perfected;

The proceeds are cash proceeds or of the same type as the collateral; and

In the case of proceeds that are proceeds of proceeds, all intervening proceeds are cash proceeds, proceeds of the same type as the collateral, or an account relating to the collateral.

First to file priority rule for certain collateral.Subject to subsection (e) of this Code section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, if a security interest in chattel paper, deposit accounts, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter of credit rights is perfected by a method other than filing, conflicting perfected security interests in proceeds of the collateral rank according to priority in time of filing.

Applicability of subsection (d) of this Code section.Subsection (d) of this Code section applies only if the proceeds of the collateral are not cash proceeds, chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, investment property, or letter of credit rights.

Limitations on subsections (a) through (e) of this Code section.Subsections (a) through (e) of this Code section are subject to:

Subsection (g) of this Code section and the other provisions of this part;

Code Section 11-4-210 with respect to a security interest of a collecting bank;

Code Section 11-5-118 with respect to a security interest of an issuer or nominated person; and

Code Section 11-9-110 with respect to a security interest arising under Article 2 or 2A of this title.

Priority under agricultural lien statute.A perfected agricultural lien on collateral has priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the same collateral if the statute creating the agricultural lien so provides.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-322, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-322.1.
Crops produced with new value.

A perfected security interest in growing crops for new value given to enable the debtor to produce the crops during the production season and given not more than three months before the crops become growing crops by planting or otherwise takes priority over an earlier perfected security interest or agricultural lien to the extent that such earlier interest or lien secures obligations incurred more than six months before the crops become growing crops by planting or otherwise, even though the person giving new value had knowledge of the earlier security interest or agricultural lien.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-322.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 995, § 5.

The 2002 amendment,

effective July 1, 2002, inserted “growing” near the beginning, inserted “or agricultural lien” and “or lien” near the middle and added “or agricultural lien” at the end.

11-9-323.
Future advances.

When priority based on time of advance.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, for purposes of determining the priority of a perfected security interest under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-322, perfection of the security interest dates from the time an advance is made to the extent that the security interest secures an advance that:

Is made while the security interest is perfected only:

Under Code Section 11-9-309 when it attaches; or

Temporarily under subsection (e), (f), or (g) of Code Section 11-9-312; and

Is not made pursuant to a commitment entered into before or while the security interest is perfected by a method other than under Code Section 11-9-309 or subsection (e), (f), or (g) of Code Section 11-9-312.

Buyer of receivables.Subsection (a) of this Code section does not apply to a security interest held by a secured party that is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes or a consignor.

Buyer of goods.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, a buyer of goods other than a buyer in ordinary course of business takes free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the buyer’s purchase; or

Forty-five days after the purchase.

Advances made pursuant to commitment; priority of buyer of goods.Subsection (c) of this Code section does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the buyer’s purchase and before the expiration of the 45 day period.

Lessee of goods.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, a lessee of goods, other than a lessee in ordinary course of business, takes the leasehold interest free of a security interest to the extent that it secures advances made after the earlier of:

The time the secured party acquires knowledge of the lease; or

Forty-five days after the lease contract becomes enforceable.

Advances made pursuant to commitment; priority of lessee of goods.Subsection (e) of this Code section does not apply if the advance is made pursuant to a commitment entered into without knowledge of the lease and before the expiration of the 45 day period.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-323, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-324.
Priority of purchase money security interests.

General rule; purchase money priority.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a perfected purchase money security interest in goods other than inventory or livestock has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same goods, and, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-327, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority if the purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the collateral or within 20 days thereafter.

Inventory purchase money priority.Subject to subsection (c) of this Code section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a perfected purchase money security interest in inventory has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same inventory, has priority over a conflicting security interest in chattel paper or an instrument constituting proceeds of the inventory and in proceeds of the chattel paper, if so provided in Code Section 11-9-330, and, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-327, also has priority in identifiable cash proceeds of the inventory to the extent the identifiable cash proceeds are received on or before the delivery of the inventory to a buyer, if:

The purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the inventory;

The purchase money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within five years before the debtor receives possession of the inventory; and

The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in inventory of the debtor and describes the inventory.

Holders of conflicting inventory security interests to be notified.Paragraphs (2) through (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of inventory:

If the purchase money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

If the purchase money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under subsection (f) of Code Section 11-9-312, before the beginning of the 20 day period thereunder.

Livestock purchase money priority.Subject to subsection (e) of this Code section and except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a perfected purchase money security interest in livestock that are farm products has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same livestock, and, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-327, a perfected security interest in their identifiable proceeds and identifiable products in their unmanufactured states also has priority, if:

The purchase money security interest is perfected when the debtor receives possession of the livestock;

The purchase money secured party sends an authenticated notification to the holder of the conflicting security interest;

The holder of the conflicting security interest receives the notification within six months before the debtor receives possession of the livestock; and

The notification states that the person sending the notification has or expects to acquire a purchase money security interest in livestock of the debtor and describes the livestock.

Holders of conflicting livestock security interests to be notified.Paragraphs (2) through (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section apply only if the holder of the conflicting security interest had filed a financing statement covering the same types of livestock:

If the purchase money security interest is perfected by filing, before the date of the filing; or

If the purchase money security interest is temporarily perfected without filing or possession under subsection (f) of Code Section 11-9-312, before the beginning of the 20 day period thereunder.

Software purchase money priority.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, a perfected purchase money security interest in software has priority over a conflicting security interest in the same collateral, and, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-327, a perfected security interest in its identifiable proceeds also has priority, to the extent that the purchase money security interest in the goods in which the software was acquired for use has priority in the goods and proceeds of the goods under this Code section.

Conflicting purchase money security interests.If more than one security interest qualifies for priority in the same collateral under subsection (a), (b), (d), or (f) of this Code section:

A security interest securing an obligation incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral has priority over a security interest securing an obligation incurred for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of collateral; and

In all other cases, subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-322 applies to the qualifying security interests.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-324, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-325.
Priority of security interests in transferred collateral.

Subordination of security interest in transferred collateral.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, a security interest created by a debtor is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral created by another person if:

The debtor acquired the collateral subject to the security interest created by the other person;

The security interest created by the other person was perfected when the debtor acquired the collateral; and

There is no period thereafter when the security interest is unperfected.

Limitation of subsection (a) of this Code section subordination.Subsection (a) of this Code section subordinates a security interest only if the security interest:

Otherwise would have priority solely under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-322 or Code Section 11-9-324; or

Arose solely under subsection (3) of Code Section 11-2-711 or subsection (5) of Code Section 11-2A-508.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-325, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-326.
Priority of security interests created by new debtor.

Subordination of security interest created by new debtor.Subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, a security interest that is created by a new debtor in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights and is perfected solely by a filed financing statement that would be ineffective to perfect the security interest but for the application of paragraph (1) of subsection (i) of Code Section 11-9-316 or Code Section 11-9-508 is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than by such a filed financing statement.

Priority under other provisions; multiple original debtors.The other provisions of this part determine the priority among conflicting security interests in the same collateral perfected by filed financing statements described in subsection (a) of this Code section. However, if the security agreements to which a new debtor became bound as debtor were not entered into by the same original debtor, the conflicting security interests rank according to priority in time of the new debtor’s having become bound.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-326, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 7/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (a), which formerly read: “

Subordination of security interests created by new debtor.

Subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, a security interest created by a new debtor which is perfected by a filed financing statement that is effective solely under Code Section 11-9-508 in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights is subordinate to a security interest in the same collateral which is perfected other than by a filed financing statement that is effective solely under Code Section 11-9-508.”; and substituted “described in subsection (a) of this Code section” for “that are effective solely under Code Section 11-9-508” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

11-9-327.
Priority of security interests in deposit account.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same deposit account:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the deposit account under Code Section 11-9-104 has priority over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this Code section, security interests perfected by control under Code Section 11-9-314 rank according to priority in time of obtaining control;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (4) of this Code section, a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party; and

A security interest perfected by control under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-104 has priority over a security interest held by the bank with which the deposit account is maintained.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-327, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-328.
Priority of security interests in investment property.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same investment property:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of investment property under Code Section 11-9-106 has priority over a security interest held by a secured party that does not have control of the investment property;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this Code section, conflicting security interests held by secured parties each of which has control under Code Section 11-9-106 rank according to priority in time of:

If the collateral is a security, obtaining control;

If the collateral is a security entitlement carried in a securities account and:

If the secured party obtained control under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Code Section 11-8-106, the secured party’s becoming the person for which the securities account is maintained;

If the secured party obtained control under paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Code Section 11-8-106, the securities intermediary’s agreement to comply with the secured party’s entitlement orders with respect to security entitlements carried or to be carried in the securities account; or

If the secured party obtained control through another person under paragraph (3) of subsection (d) of Code Section 11-8-106, the time on which priority would be based under this paragraph if the other person were the secured party; or

If the collateral is a commodity contract carried with a commodity intermediary, the satisfaction of the requirement for control specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-106 with respect to commodity contracts carried or to be carried with the commodity intermediary;

A security interest held by a securities intermediary in a security entitlement or a securities account maintained with the securities intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party;

A security interest held by a commodity intermediary in a commodity contract or a commodity account maintained with the commodity intermediary has priority over a conflicting security interest held by another secured party;

A security interest in a certificated security in registered form which is perfected by taking delivery under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-313 and not by control under Code Section 11-9-314 has priority over a conflicting security interest perfected by a method other than control;

Conflicting security interests created by a broker, securities intermediary, or commodity intermediary which are perfected without control under Code Section 11-9-106 rank equally; and

In all other cases, priority among conflicting security interests in investment property is governed by Code Sections 11-9-322 and 11-9-323.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-328, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-329.
Priority of security interests in letter of credit right.

The following rules govern priority among conflicting security interests in the same letter of credit right:

A security interest held by a secured party having control of the letter of credit right under Code Section 11-9-107 has priority to the extent of its control over a conflicting security interest held by a secured party that does not have control; and

Security interests perfected by control under Code Section 11-9-314 rank according to priority in time of obtaining control.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-329, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-330.
Priority of purchaser of chattel paper or instrument.

Purchaser’s priority; security interest claimed merely as proceeds.A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if:

In good faith and in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under Code Section 11-9-105; and

The chattel paper does not indicate that it has been assigned to an identified assignee other than the purchaser.

Purchaser’s priority; other security interests.A purchaser of chattel paper has priority over a security interest in the chattel paper which is claimed other than merely as proceeds of inventory subject to a security interest if the purchaser gives new value and takes possession of the chattel paper or obtains control of the chattel paper under Code Section 11-9-105 in good faith, in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business, and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Chattel paper purchaser’s priority in proceeds.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-327, a purchaser having priority in chattel paper under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section also has priority in proceeds of the chattel paper to the extent that:

Code Section 11-9-322 provides for priority in the proceeds; or

The proceeds consist of the specific goods covered by the chattel paper or cash proceeds of the specific goods, even if the purchaser’s security interest in the proceeds is unperfected.

Instrument purchaser’s priority.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-331, a purchaser of an instrument has priority over a security interest in the instrument perfected by a method other than possession if the purchaser gives value and takes possession of the instrument in good faith and without knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

Holder of purchase money security interest gives new value.For purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the holder of a purchase money security interest in inventory gives new value for chattel paper constituting proceeds of the inventory.

Indication of assignment gives knowledge.For purposes of subsections (b) and (d) of this Code section, if chattel paper or an instrument indicates that it has been assigned to an identified secured party other than the purchaser, a purchaser of the chattel paper or instrument has knowledge that the purchase violates the rights of the secured party.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-330, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-331.
Priority of rights of purchasers of instruments, documents, and securities under other articles; priority of interests in financial assets and security entitlements under Article 8 of this title.

Rights under Articles 3, 7, and 8 of this title not limited.This article does not limit the rights of a holder in due course of a negotiable instrument, a holder to which a negotiable document of title has been duly negotiated, or a protected purchaser of a security. These holders or purchasers take priority over an earlier security interest, even if perfected, to the extent provided in Articles 3, 7, and 8 of this title.

Protection under Article 8 of this title.This article does not limit the rights of or impose liability on a person to the extent that the person is protected against the assertion of a claim under Article 8 of this title.

Filing not notice.Filing under this article does not constitute notice of a claim or defense to the holders or purchasers or persons described in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-331, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-332.
Transfer of money; transfer of funds from deposit account.

Transferee of money.A transferee of money takes the money free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

Transferee of funds from deposit account.A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-332, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-333.
Priority of certain liens.

Year’s support; property taxes; other state taxes; other taxes or judgments.Except as is expressly provided to the contrary elsewhere in this article and in subsection (b) of this Code section, a perfected security interest in collateral takes priority over each and all of the liens, claims, and rights described in Code Section 44-14-320, relating to the establishment of certain liens, as now or hereafter amended; former Code Section 53-7-91 as such existed on December 31, 1997, if applicable; and Code Section 53-7-40, relating to the priority of debts against the estate of a decedent, as now or hereafter amended; provided, nevertheless, that:

Year’s support to the family, duly set apart in the collateral prior to the perfection of the subject security interest, takes priority over such security interest;

A lien for property taxes duly assessed upon the subject collateral, either prior or subsequent to the perfection of the subject security interest, takes priority over security interest;

A lien for all state taxes takes priority over such security interest, except where such security interest is perfected by filing a financing statement relative thereto prior to such time as the execution for such state taxes shall be filed in the manner provided by law; provided, nevertheless, that, with respect to priority rights between such tax liens and security interests where under this article the same are perfected other than by filing a financing statement, the same shall be determined as provided by law prior to January 1, 1964; and

A lien for other unpaid taxes or a duly rendered judgment of a court having jurisdiction shall have the same priority with regard to a security interest as it would have if the tax lien or judgment were a conflicting security interest within the meaning of Code Section 11-9-322 or an encumbrance within the meaning of Code Section 11-9-334, which conflicting security interest was perfected by filing or which encumbrance arose at the time the tax lien or judgment was duly recorded in the place designated by statute applicable thereto.

Mechanics’ liens on farm machinery.A mechanics’ lien on farm machinery or equipment arising on or after July 1, 1985, shall have priority over any perfected security interest in such farm machinery or equipment unless a financing statement has been filed as provided in Code Section 11-9-501 and unless the financing statement describes the particular piece of farm machinery or equipment to which the perfected security interest applies. Such description may include the make, model, and serial number of the piece of farm machinery or equipment. However, such description shall be sufficient whether or not it is specific if it reasonably identifies what is described and a mistake in such description shall not invalidate the description if it provides a key to identifying the farm machinery or equipment.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-333, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 11/HB 142; Ga. L. 2017, p. 723, § 10/HB 337.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 13, 2011, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “hereafter amended; former Code Section 53-7-91 as such existed on December 31, 1997, if applicable; and Code Section 53-7-40,” for “hereafter amended, and Code Section 53-7-91 of the ‘Pre-1998 Probate Code,’ if applicable, or Code Section 53-7-40 of the ‘Revised Probate Code of 1998,’ ” in subsection (a).

The 2017 amendment,

effective January 1, 2018, in paragraph (a)(3), deleted “other” preceding “state taxes” near the beginning, and substituted “filed” for “entered on the execution docket in the place and” in the middle.